Maryland, session 2025, HB0273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–201.
(a) This subtitle is applicable only to residential leases unless otherwise provided.
(b) This subtitle does not apply to a tenancy arising after the sale of
owner–occupied residential property where the seller and purchaser agree that the seller
may remain in possession of the property for a period of not more than 60 days after the
settlement.
8–208.
(d) A landlord may not use a lease or form of lease containing any provision that:
(3) (i) Provides for a penalty for the late payment of rent in excess of
5% of the amount of UNPAID rent due for the rental period for which the payment was
delinquent; or
– 1 –

Ch. 580 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) In the case of leases under which the rent is paid in weekly rental
installments, provides for a late penalty of more than $3 per week or a total of no more than
$12 per month;
(g) (1) Any lease provision which is prohibited by terms of this section shall be
unenforceable by the landlord.
(2) If the landlord includes in any lease a provision prohibited by this
section or made unenforceable by § 8–105 of this title or § 8–203 of this subtitle, at any time
subsequent to July 1, 1975, and tenders a lease containing such a provision or attempts to
enforce or makes known to the tenant an intent to enforce any such provision, the tenant
may recover any actual damages incurred as a reason thereof, including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –